Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.420

Utilities—City may support county in which generating plant located—Cities with a population greater than five hundred thousand responsible for impact payments and arrearages—Arbitration.

(1) Any city owning and operating a public utility and having facilities for the generation of electricity located in a county other than that in which the city is located, may provide for the public peace, health, safety and welfare of such county as concerns the facilities and the personnel employed in connection therewith, by contributing to the support of the county government of any such county and enter into contracts with any such county therefor.

(2)(a) Any city with a population greater than five hundred thousand people owning and operating a public utility and having facilities for the generation of electricity located in a county other than that in which the city is located, must provide for the impacts of lost revenue and the public peace, health, safety, and welfare of such county as concerns the facilities and the personnel employed in connection therewith, by contributing to the support of the county, city, or town government and school district of any such county and enter into contracts with any such county therefor as specified in RCW 35.21.425.

(b)(i) In the event a contract entered into under this section between a county and the governing body of a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand people authorized or required under this section expires prior to the adoption of a new contract between the parties, the city must continue to make compensatory payments calculated based on the payment terms set forth in the most recent expired compensation contract between the city and the county until such time as a new contract is entered into by the parties.

(ii) In the event a contract entered into under this section between a county and the governing body of a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand people expired prior to June 10, 2010, the city shall be indebted to the county for any resulting arrearage accruing from the time of the expiration of the contract until such time as a new contract is entered into by the parties. The dollar amount of such arrearage shall be calculated retroactively by reference to the payment terms set forth in the most recent expired compensation contract between the city and the county.

(c) In the event a contract entered into under this section between a county and the governing body of a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand people expires, or has expired prior to June 10, 2010, and the county and the city are unable to reach agreement on a new contract within six months of such expiration, then either the county or the city may initiate the arbitration procedures set forth in RCW 35.21.426 by serving a written notice of intent to arbitrate on the other. Arbitration must commence within sixty days of service of such notice, and must follow the arbitration procedures as provided in RCW 35.21.426. The city is responsible for the costs of arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrators' services, except that the city and the county shall bear their own costs for attorneys' fees and their own costs of litigation.

[ 2010 c 199 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.420. Prior: 1951 c 104 s 1.]